Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2322
Commission; access to premises.

The commission shall have access, upon notification, to any premises where domesticated cervine animals may be for the purpose of assessing or removing populations of wild cervidae.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 21;

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 40.